District of Columbia statutes.
46-351.01

Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 101, 63 DCR 222
For temporary (90 days) enactment of this chapter, see §§ 101-903 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Emergency Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-301, Feb. 18, 2016, 63 DCR 2139).
For temporary (90 days) enactment of this chapter, see §§ 101-903 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-215, Nov. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 15616).